Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 3. Commissioner of Highways.
§ 33.2-246.
Recreational waysides; regulations; penalties.

To promote the safety, convenience, and enjoyment of travel on, and protection of the public investment in, highways of the Commonwealth and for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty within and adjoining such highways, it is hereby declared to be in the public interest to acquire and establish recreational waysides and areas of scenic beauty adjoining the highways of the Commonwealth.

The Commissioner of Highways may, whenever in his opinion it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth, accept from the United States, or any authorized agency thereof, a grant or grants of any recreational waysides established and constructed by the United States, or any such agency thereof, or a grant or grants of funds for landscaping and scenic enhancement of highways, and the Commissioner of Highways may, on behalf of the Commonwealth, enter into a contract or contracts with the United States, or any such agency thereof, to maintain and operate any such recreational waysides that may be so granted to the Commonwealth and may do all things necessary to receive and expend federal funds for landscaping and scenic enhancement.

The Commissioner of Highways may, whenever it is in the best interest of the operation of the Interstate System or the primary or secondary state highway system, establish, construct, maintain, and operate appropriate recreational waysides and areas of scenic beauty adjoining such highways.

The Commissioner of Highways may acquire by purchase, gift, or the power of eminent domain such land or interest in land as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, provided that in exercising the power of eminent domain for areas of scenic beauty, such areas adjoin and lie within 100 feet of the right-of-way of the highway, and the procedure shall be, mutatis mutandis, as provided for the acquisition of land by the Commissioner of Highways in Article 1 (§

33.2-1000

et seq.) of Chapter 10.

The Board may establish regulations for the use of recreational waysides, including regulations relating to (i) the time, place, and manner of parking of vehicles; (ii) activities that may be conducted within such waysides; (iii) solicitation and selling within the waysides; and (iv) such other matters as may be necessary or expedient in the interest of the motoring public.The regulations when adopted by the Board shall be posted in a conspicuous place at each wayside, along with such other signs as the Commissioner of Highways deems necessary to advise the public.Any person violating any regulation adopted under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $5 nor more than $100 for each offense.

Recreational waysides and areas of scenic beauty when acquired, established, maintained, and operated in accordance with this section shall be deemed to be a part of the Interstate System or primary or secondary state highway system but land acquired for areas of scenic beauty shall not be deemed a part of the right-of-way for the purpose of future acquisition of areas of scenic beauty under the provisions of subsections A through D.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-133, 33-133.1, 33-134; 1966, c. 470; 1968, c. 566; 1970, c. 322, §§ 33.1-217, 33.1-218, 33.1-219; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-247.
Wetlands mitigation banking.

When authorization is required by federal or state law for any project affecting wetlands and such authorization is conditioned upon compensatory mitigation for adverse impacts to wetlands, the Commissioner of Highways is authorized to expend funds for the purchase of, or is authorized to use, credits from any wetlands mitigation bank, including any owned by the Department of Transportation, that has been approved and is operating in accordance with applicable federal and state guidance, laws, or regulations for the establishment, use, and operation of mitigation banks as long as (i) the bank is in the same fourth order subbasin, as defined by the hydrologic unit boundaries of the National Watershed Boundary Dataset or by the hydrologic unit system or dataset utilized and depicted or described in the bank’s approved mitigation banking instrument, as the impacted site, or in an adjacent subbasin within the same river watershed as the impacted site, or it meets all the conditions found in clauses (a) through (d) and either clause (e) or (f); (ii) the bank is ecologically preferable to practicable on-site and off-site individual mitigation options, as defined by federal wetland regulations; and (iii) the banking instrument, if approved after July 1, 1996, has been approved by a process that included public review and comment. When the bank is not located in the same subbasin or adjacent subbasin within the same river watershed as the impacted site, the purchase or use of credits shall not be allowed unless the Commissioner of Highways demonstrates to the satisfaction of the agency requiring compensatory mitigation that (a) the impacts will occur as a result of a Department of Transportation linear project; (b) there is no practical same river watershed mitigation alternative; (c) the impacts are less than one acre in a single and complete project within a subbasin; (d) there is no significant harm to water quality or fish and wildlife resources within the river watershed of the impacted site; and either (e) impacts within the Chesapeake Bay watershed are mitigated within the Chesapeake Bay watershed as close as possible to the impacted site or (f) impacts within subbasins 02080108, 02080208, and 03010205, as defined by the National Watershed Boundary Dataset, are mitigated in-kind within those subbasins, as close as possible to the impacted site. After July 1, 2002, the provisions of clause (f) shall apply only to impacts within subdivisions of the listed subbasins where overlapping watersheds exist, as determined by the Department of Environmental Quality, provided the Department of Environmental Quality has made such a determination by that date. For the purposes of this subsection, the hydrologic unit boundaries of the National Watershed Boundary Dataset or other hydrologic unit system may be adjusted by the Department of Environmental Quality to reflect site-specific geographic or hydrologic information provided by the bank sponsor.

For the purposes of this section, “river watershed” means the Potomac River Basin, Shenandoah River Basin, James River Basin, Rappahannock River Basin, Roanoke and Yadkin Rivers Basin, Chowan River Basin (including the Dismal Swamp and Albemarle Sound), Tennessee River Basin, Big Sandy River Basin, Chesapeake Bay and its Small Coastal Basins, Atlantic Ocean, York River Basin, and New River Basin.

History.

1996, c. 736, § 33.1-223.2:1; 1999, c. 8; 2011, c. 253; 2014, cc. 332, 805.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2014, c. 332 amended former § 33.1-223.2:1, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
2014 amendment by c. 332 has been given effect in this section by inserting “or by the hydrologic unit system or dataset utilized and depicted or described in the bank’s approved mitigation banking instrument,” in clause (i) and adding the last sentence in the first paragraph.

§ 33.2-248.
Expenditure of funds for interstate bridges and approaches.

The Commissioner of Highways may expend from funds available for construction or maintenance of roads or highways, either alone or in cooperation with public road authorities of other states, such funds as he may deem necessary for the construction, maintenance, operation, and repair of interstate highway bridges, tunnels, and approaches forming connecting links between highways in the systems of state highways and public roads of other states.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-172; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-248; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-249.
Maintenance and operation of bridges or tunnels on the city and state line.

The governing bodies of cities and towns having populations greater than 3,500 and the Commissioner of Highways may enter into agreements, upon such terms and conditions as may be necessary, for the maintenance of public highway bridges or tunnels lying partly within and partly outside the incorporated limits of such cities and towns.

The Commissioner of Highways may enter into agreements with other states and the District of Columbia, upon such terms and conditions as may be necessary, for the maintenance and operation, including the issuance of permits, of public highway bridges or tunnels lying partly within and partly outside the territorial limits of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-172.1; 1956, c. 28; 1964, c. 374; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-249; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-250.
Improving certain private roads and certain town streets and roads.

The Commissioner of Highways may, upon the request of the governing body of any county and at the expense of the owner of the land, improve private roads giving direct access from the home or other central buildings on the property along the shortest practical route to the nearest public highway, provided that:

The Commissioner of Highways shall in no case undertake any such work until certification is made by the governing body of the county that the property owner cannot secure the services of a private contractor to perform the work nor then until the owner has deposited with him a certified check in the amount estimated by the Commissioner of Highways as the cost of the work;

Not more than $1,000 shall be expended on any one such private project in any one year; and

No work of ordinary maintenance shall be done on any such private road under the provisions of this section.

In addition, the Commissioner of Highways may, upon the request of the council of any town having a population of less than 1,500 and at the expense of such town, improve and maintain any streets or roads in such town and not in the primary state highway system. As to streets and roads in such town, no certification by the board of supervisors or deposit shall be necessary.

Any work done by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to the provisions of this section shall only be done with the equipment and employees of the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-118; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-201; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-251.
Installation and maintenance of “children at play” signs in counties and towns.

The governing body of any county or town may enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of Highways allowing the county or town to install and maintain, at locations specified in such agreement, signs alerting motorists that children may be at play nearby. The cost of the signs and their installation shall be paid by the county or town.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any county that has withdrawn its roads from the secondary state highway system under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 and has not elected to return.

History.

1997, c. 167, § 33.1-210.2; 2006, c. 548; 2012, c. 179; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-252.
Tramways and railways along or across public highways; appeals.

Whenever any person, firm, or chartered company engaged in mining, manufacturing, or lumber getting has acquired the right-of-way for a tramway or railway, except across or upon a public highway, and desires to cross such highway or some part thereof and if such person, firm, or chartered company cannot agree with the Commissioner of Highways, or governing body of a county if the road is a county road in a county where the roads are not within the secondary state highway system, as to the terms and conditions of such crossing, the circuit court of the county in which such highway may be may prescribe such regulations for the crossing of such highway as will protect the public, and when such regulations have been prescribed, such tramway or railway may be constructed and maintained or if already constructed may be maintained in accordance with such regulations as may be made on the application of the owner of such tramway or railway or on the motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth after notice to such owner.

The Commissioner of Highways or governing body or the applicant or owner of the tramway or railway may appeal from the order of the circuit court in the manner prescribed for appeals in controversies concerning roads.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as giving the right to condemn private property for such tramway or railway, nor shall the rights of any tramway or railway lawfully acquired be affected.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-126, 33-127, 33-128; 1970, c. 322, §§ 33.1-211, 33.1-212, 33.1-213; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-253.
Highway safety corridor program.

The Commissioner of Highways shall establish a highway safety corridor program under which a portion of highways in the primary state highway system and Interstate System may be designated by the Commissioner of Highways as highway safety corridors to address highway safety problems through law enforcement, education, and safety enhancements. In consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Superintendent of State Police, the Commissioner of Highways shall establish criteria for the designation and evaluation of highway safety corridors, including a review of crash data, accident reports, type and volume of vehicle traffic, and engineering and traffic studies. The Commissioner of Highways shall hold a public hearing prior to the adoption of the criteria to be used for designating a highway safety corridor. The Commissioner of Highways shall hold a minimum of one public hearing before designating any specific highway corridor as a highway safety corridor. The public hearing or hearings for a specific corridor shall be held at least 30 days prior to the designation at a location as close to the proposed corridor as practical.

The Department of Transportation shall erect signs that designate highway safety corridors and the penalties for violations committed within the designated corridors.

History.

2003, c. 877, § 33.1-223.2:8; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to fines for violations committed within the highway safety corridor, and report on the benefits derived from the designation of such highway safety corridors, see § 46.2-947.

Editor’s note.

Former § 33.1-223.2:8, from which this section was derived, was enacted as
§ 33.1-233.2:7 by Acts
2003, c. 877, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 33.2-254.
Erection and maintenance of newspaper route boxes.

The publishers of all newspapers having a circulation in rural sections of the Commonwealth may erect and maintain suitable newspaper route boxes along and on the rights-of-way of the public highways throughout such rural sections, in which to deposit newspapers for their subscribers. The short name of the newspaper to be deposited in each such box, but nothing more, may be plainly printed thereon. All such boxes shall be located so they do not interfere with or endanger public travel on highways. All such locations shall meet with the approval of the Commissioner of Highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-122; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-206; 1979, c. 427; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-255.
Sale or lease of properties acquired for highway construction.

To the extent not otherwise prohibited by law, the Commissioner of Highways may sell or otherwise dispose of any improvements on lands acquired for highway construction projects or lease such land and improvements until such time as the land is needed for immediate highway construction purposes. Any residue parcels of lands so acquired that are found to be unnecessary for highway purposes may be sold or otherwise disposed of by the Commissioner of Highways.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-75.8; 1964, c. 263; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-140; 2014, c. 805.